North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57. Hospital, Medical and Dental Service Corporations.
§§ 57-1 through 57-38.
[Repealed]

Recodified as Articles 65 and 66 of Chapter 58.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter has been recodified as Articles 65 and 66 of Chapter 58, under the authority of Session Laws 1987, c. 752, s. 9 and Session Laws 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 975, s. 34.

Former G.S. 57-14 was repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 814, s. 5, effective July 1, 1988. Former G.S. 57-21 to 57-29 had been reserved.

For old to new section correlations, see the table of disposition provided at the end of Chapter 58.